Nebraska, session 109, LB1157.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1157 LB1157
2026 2026
1 Section 1. Any payment issued on or after January 1, 2027, from a
2 health insurer, a health insurer's contracted vendor, or a care
3 management organization, to a health care provider for health care
4 services shall not require that the only acceptable payment method is a
5 credit card.
-2-